Utah statutes.
58-9-610.   Cremation procedures.
(1)  A funeral service establishment may not cremate human remains until the
funeral service establishment:
(a)  completes and files a death certificate with the office of vital
statistics and the county health department as indicated on the regular
medical certificate of death or the coroner's certificate; and
(b)  complies with the provisions of Section 26-4-29.
(2) (a)  A funeral service establishment may not cremate human remains with a
pacemaker or other battery-powered, potentially hazardous implant in place.
(b) (i)  An authorizing agent for the cremation of human remains is
responsible for informing the funeral service establishment in writing on the
cremation authorization form about the presence of a pacemaker or other
battery-powered, potentially hazardous implant in the human remains to be
cremated.
(ii) (A)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b)(ii)(B), the authorizing
agent is responsible to ensure that a pacemaker or other battery-powered,
potentially hazardous implant is removed prior to cremation.
(B)  If the authorizing agent informs the funeral service establishment of the
presence of a pacemaker or other battery-powered, potentially hazardous
implant under Subsection (2)(b)(i), and the funeral service establishment
fails to have the pacemaker or other battery-powered, potentially hazardous
implant removed prior to cremation, then the funeral service establishment is
liable for all resulting damages.
(3)  Only authorized persons are permitted in the crematory while human
remains are in the crematory area awaiting cremation, being cremated, or being
removed from the cremation chamber.
(4) (a)  Simultaneous cremation of the human remains of more than one person
within the same cremation chamber or processor is not allowed, unless the
funeral service establishment has received specific written authorization to
do so from the authorizing agent of each person to be cremated.
(b)  The written authorization, described in Subsection (4)(a), exempts the
funeral license establishment from liability for co-mingling of the cremated
remains during the cremation process.
(5)  A funeral service establishment shall:
(a)  verify the identification of human remains as indicated on a cremation
container immediately before placing the human remains in the cremation
chamber;
(b)  attach a metal identification tag to the cremation container;
(c)  remove the identification tag from the cremation container; and
(d)  place the identification tag near the cremation chamber control where the
identification tag shall remain until the cremation process is complete.
(6)  Upon completion of a cremation, the funeral service establishment shall:
(a)  in so far as is possible, remove all of the recoverable residue of the
cremation process from the cremation chamber;
(b)  separate all other residue from the cremation process from remaining bone
fragments, in so far as possible, and process the bone fragments so as to
reduce them to unidentifiable particles; and
(c)  remove anything other than the unidentifiable bone particles from the
cremated residuals, as far as is possible, and dispose of that material.
(7) (a)  A funeral service establishment shall pack cremated remains,
including the identification tag described in Subsection (5), in a temporary
container or urn ordered by the authorizing agent.
(b)  The container or urn shall be packed in clean packing materials and not
be contaminated with any other object, unless otherwise directed by the
authorizing agent.
(c)  If the cremated remains cannot fit within the designated temporary
container or urn, the funeral service establishment shall:
(i)  return the excess to the authorizing agent or the agent's representative
in a separate container; and
(ii)  mark both containers or urns on the outside with the name of the
deceased person and an indication that the cremated remains of the named
decedent are in both containers or urns.
(8) (a)  If the cremated remains are to be shipped, then the funeral services
establishment shall pack the designated temporary container or urn in a
suitable, sturdy container.
(b)  The funeral service establishment shall have the remains shipped only by
a method that:
(i)  has an available internal tracing system; and
(ii)  provides a receipt signed by the person accepting delivery.
